Alabama, session 2026rs, HB373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-37-230, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§45-37-230
(a) Effective beginning the next term of office, the
annual salary of the Sheriff of Jefferson County shall be one
hundred sixty thousand dollars ($160,000).
(b) Effective beginning the next term of office, the
sheriff shall receive the same cost-of-living increases
provided to deputy sheriffs in Jefferson County granted after
that date.
(c)(1) Effective beginning on the effective date of
this act, the sheriff shall receive an additional expense
allowance of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) per year,
payable in equal monthly installments from the general fund of
the county.
(2) This expense allowance shall be in addition to all
Page 1

(2) This expense allowance shall be in addition to all
HB373 INTRODUCED
other compensation or benefits received by the sheriff and may
be treated as compensation for retirement contributions.
(d) Effective beginning with the next term of office,
the annual salary of the sheriff shall be two hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000), and the compensation
provided for in subsections (a) and (c) shall be void."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on the first
day of the first month following its passage and approval by
the Governor, or its otherwise becoming law.
Page 2